Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 69. Organization and Corporate Procedures.
Sec. 21.69.310.
Meetings of stockholders or members.

Meetings of stockholders or members of a domestic insurer shall be held in the city or town of its principal office or place of business. The meetings may be held, for good cause, in another location upon approval of the director.

A meeting of stockholders or members may not amend the insurer’s articles of incorporation unless the proposal to amend was included in the notice of the meeting.

Each insurer shall, during the first six months of each calendar year, hold the annual meeting of its stockholders or members to fill vacancies existing or occurring in the board of directors, receive and consider reports of the insurer’s officers as to its affairs, and transact other business that may properly be brought before it. The director may approve a later date for the annual meeting upon written request by the insurer and with good cause shown. The request for a later annual meeting date shall be made in writing to the director at least 30 days before the end of the six-month requirement. Not less than 20 days’ notice shall be given of the meeting in the manner provided in the bylaws, except where notice of the annual meeting of a mutual insurer is contained in its policies.

Special meetings of the stockholders or members may be called at any time for any purpose by the board of directors upon not less than 10 days’ notice as provided in the bylaws. The notice shall state the purpose of the meeting, and no business may be transacted at the meeting if notice was not given.

If more than 15 months are allowed to elapse without an annual stockholders’ or members’ meeting being held, a stockholder or member may call a meeting to be held. At any time, upon written request of a director, or of stockholders or members holding in the aggregate one-fifth of the voting power of all stockholders or members, it shall be the duty of the secretary to call a special meeting of stockholders or members to be held at the time the secretary may fix, not less than 10 or more than 30 days after the receipt of the request. If the secretary fails to issue the call, the director, stockholders, or members making the request may do so.

A stockholders’ or members’ meeting can be organized for the transaction of business whenever a quorum is present. Except as otherwise provided by law or the articles of incorporation,

the presence, in person or by proxy, of the holders of a majority of the voting power of all stockholders or of all members constitutes a quorum;

the stockholders or members present at a meeting can continue to do business until adjournment, notwithstanding the withdrawal of enough stockholders or members to leave less than a quorum;

if a necessary officer fails to attend the meeting, a stockholder or member present may be elected to act temporarily in lieu of the absent officer;

if a meeting cannot be organized because a quorum has not attended, those present may adjourn the meeting to a time they may determine, but if a meeting was called for the election of a director the adjournment must be to the next day. Those who attend the second of the adjourned meetings, although less than a quorum, constitute a quorum for the purpose of electing a director;

an annual or special meeting of stockholders or members may be adjourned to another date without new notice being given.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 93 ch 81 SLA 1997; am §§
57, 58 ch 41 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 16, 2016, in (a), deleted “in this state” following “business” and “within the state” following “location”; in (c), added the second sentence; made related and stylistic changes.

Sec. 21.69.320.
Proxies.

The director shall adopt regulations concerning proxies, consents and authorizations in respect to securities issued by domestic insurance companies. The regulations adopted shall substantially conform to the recommendations of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.330.
Corrupt practices.

The director shall adopt regulations regarding the conduct of meetings of shareholders and members of an insurer and the purchase, sale, and bartering of votes and proxies.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.340.
Directors.

The affairs of every domestic insurer shall be managed by the number of directors fixed in the insurer’s bylaws, which shall not be less than five or more than 21 directors.

Directors must be elected at the time and place, and for the terms, not exceeding three years, provided in a domestic insurer’s bylaws. Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, a director is not required to be a member or stockholder of the insurer.

The term of a director extends until a successor has been elected and has qualified.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 21 SLA 2020)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective July 19, 2020, in (b), rewrote the first sentence and added the second sentence.

Sec. 21.69.350.
Participation of policyholders in election of directors.

The bylaws of a domestic stock life insurer may provide a plan for its policyholders to participate in the election of its directors.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 21 SLA 2020)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective July 19, 2020, deleted “with stockholders” following “participate” near the end of the section.

Sec. 21.69.360.
Bond of officers of mutual.

The president, secretary, and treasurer of a mutual insurer shall each file with the director and thereafter maintain in force as long as the person is an officer, a fidelity bond in the sum of $10,000 issued by an authorized corporate surety in favor of the insurer. In lieu of individual bonds, all these officers may be covered under a blanket bond for the same respective amounts; the blanket bond shall be filed with the director.

The premium for the bond shall be payable by the insurer.

A bond is not subject to cancellation except upon written notice to both the insurer and the director, delivered not less than 30 days in advance of the effective date of the cancellation.

The insurer shall provide for the bonding by authorized corporate surety of all other officers in any way responsible for the handling of the funds of the insurer.

This section does not limit the amount of bonded protection which the insurer may carry as to any officer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.370.
Prohibited pecuniary interest of officials.

An officer or director, or a member of a committee or an employee of a domestic insurer who is charged with the duty of investing or handling the insurer’s funds may not deposit or invest the funds except in the insurer’s corporate name; may not borrow the funds of the insurer; may not be pecuniarily interested in a loan, pledge of deposit, security, investment, sale, purchase, exchange, reinsurance, or other similar transaction or property of the insurer except as a stockholder or member; and may not take or receive to personal use a fee, brokerage, commission, gift, or other consideration for or on account of a transaction made by or on behalf of the insurer.

An insurer may not guarantee a financial obligation of any of its officers or directors.

This section does not prohibit a director or officer, or member of a committee or employee from becoming a policyholder of the insurer and enjoying the usual rights provided for its policyholders.

The director may, by regulations from time to time, define and permit additional exceptions to the prohibition contained in (a) of this section solely to enable payment of reasonable compensation to a director who is not otherwise an officer or employee of the insurer, or to a corporation or firm in which a director is interested, for necessary services performed or sales or purchases made to or for the insurer in the ordinary course of the insurer’s business and in the usual private professional or business capacity of the director or the corporation or firm.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.380.
Management and exclusive agency contracts.

A domestic insurer may not make a contract granting a person or permitting a person to enjoy in fact the management of the insurer to the substantial exclusion of its board of directors or to have the controlling or preemptive right to produce substantially all insurance business for the insurer, unless the contract is filed with and approved by the director. The contract shall be considered approved unless disapproved by the director within 20 days after date of filing, subject to a reasonable extension of time that the director may require by notice given within the 20 days. A disapproval shall be delivered to the insurer in writing, stating the grounds for it.

The director shall disapprove a contract upon a finding that it

subjects the insurer to excessive charges;

is to extend for an unreasonable length of time;

does not contain fair and adequate standards of performance; or

contains other inequitable provision or provisions that impair the proper interests of stockholders or members of the insurer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.390.
Home office and records.

Each domestic insurer shall have and maintain a place of business in this state, and shall keep in this state and in its principal place of business a complete record of its assets, transactions, and affairs in accordance with the methods and systems that are customary or suitable as to the kind or kinds of insurance transacted.

A person determined by the director, following an appropriate hearing as provided in AS

21.06.170

—

21.06.230

, to have removed or attempted to remove any records from the place where they are required to be kept under (a) of this section with the intent to wrongfully remove them, or to have concealed or attempted to conceal them from the director, is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $25,000. If a domestic insurer violates a provision of this section the director may institute delinquency proceedings against the insurer under the provisions of AS 21.78.

[Repealed, § 42 ch 14 SLA 1987.]

[Repealed, § 64 ch 41 SLA 2016.]

A domestic insurer may change the place of business or the location of records with the written approval of the director. The domestic insurer must submit a list of the records and the locations of the records that will be maintained outside of this state when requesting approval. Any change in place of business, the approved list of records, and the location of the records maintained outside of this state shall be submitted 60 days before relocation and is considered approved if not disapproved by the director within 30 days after receipt. The director shall approve the change in place of business or location of records outside of this state subject to the following standards:

the place of business is readily accessible by the general public by visit and telephone;

the records are immediately available to examiners representing the director in an examination;

the domestic insurer agrees to ship the records to the state if the insurer is ordered to do so under AS 21.78;

the location of the place of business and records outside of the state has a valid business purpose that is not satisfied by maintaining a place of business or the records in the state;

the list of records and location is of sufficient detail to readily locate specific records.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 16 ch 149 SLA 1984; am § 42 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 185 ch 67 SLA 1992; am §§ 46, 47 ch 96 SLA 2004; am § 84 ch 23 SLA 2011; am §§
59, 64 ch 41 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For record and financial reporting, see 3 AAC 21, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 16, 2016, in (b), deleted “or (d)” preceding “of this section”; repealed (d).

Sec. 21.69.400.
Vouchers for expenditures.

An insurer may not make a disbursement of $100 or more, unless evidenced by a voucher correctly describing the consideration for the payment and supported by a check or receipt endorsed or signed by or on behalf of the person receiving the money.

If the disbursement is for services and reimbursement, the voucher must describe the services and expenditures.

If the disbursement is in connection with a matter pending before a legislature or public body or before a public official, the voucher must also correctly describe the nature of the matter and of the insurer’s interest in it.

If a voucher cannot be obtained, the expenditure referred to in (a) of this section must be evidenced by an affidavit in which is set out the character and object of the expenditure and the reasons for not obtaining the voucher.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.410.
Agreement not to sell property prohibited.

An insurer may not enter into an agreement to withhold from sale any of its property.
Disposition of an insurer’s property shall be at all times within the control of its board of directors.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.420.
Solicitations in other states.

A domestic insurer may not knowingly solicit insurance business in a reciprocating state in which it is not then licensed as an authorized insurer.

This section does not prohibit advertising through publication and radio, television, and other broadcasts originating outside the reciprocating state, if the insurer is licensed in a majority of the states in which the advertising is disseminated, and if the advertising is not specifically directed to residents of the reciprocating state.

This section does not prohibit insurance covering persons or risks located in a reciprocating state under contract solicited and issued in states in which the insurer is then licensed. This section does not prohibit insurance effectuated by the insurer as an unauthorized insurer in accordance with the laws of the reciprocating state.

The director shall suspend or revoke the certificate of authority of a domestic insurer found by the director, after a hearing, to have violated this section.

In this section a “reciprocating” state is one that imposes a similar prohibition upon insurers domiciled in that state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (d) was formerly (e) and present (e) was formerly (d).
Relettered in 1984.

Sec. 21.69.430.
Contingent liability of mutual members.

Each member of a domestic mutual insurer shall, except as provided with respect to nonassessable policies, have a contingent liability, pro rata and not one for another, for the discharge of its obligations, which contingent liability shall be expressed in the policy and be in the maximum amount that is specified in the insurer’s articles of incorporation.

Termination of the policy of the member does not relieve the member of contingent liability for the member’s proportion, if any, of the obligations of the insurer that accrued while the policy was in force.

Unrealized contingent liability of members does not constitute an asset of the insurer in a determination of its financial condition.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.440.
Levy of contingent liability.

If at any time the assets of a domestic mutual insurer are less than its liabilities and the minimum amount of surplus required to be maintained by it by this title for authority to transact the kinds of insurance being transacted and the deficiency is not cured from other sources, its directors shall levy an assessment only upon its members who held policies providing for contingent liability at any time within the 12 months preceding the date notice of the assessment was mailed to them, and the members shall be liable to the insurer for the amount assessed.

The assessment shall be for the amount required to cure the deficiency and to provide a reasonable amount of working funds above the minimum amount of surplus, but the working funds so provided may not exceed five percent of the insurer’s liabilities as of the date as on which the amount of the deficiency was determined.

In levying an assessment upon a policy providing for contingent liability, the assessment shall be computed on the basis of the premiums earned on the policy during the period to which the assessment relates.

A member may not have an offset against an assessment for which the member is liable, on account of a claim for unearned premium or loss payable.

As to life insurance, any part of the assessment upon a member that remains unpaid following notice of assessment, demand for payment, and lapse of a reasonable waiting period as specified in the notice, may, if approved by the director as being in the best interests of the insurer and its members, be secured by placing a lien upon the cash surrender values and accumulated dividends held by the insurer to the credit of the member.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.450.
Enforcement of contingent liability.

An assessment made by an insurer under AS

21.69.440

or

21.69.540

shall be considered to be prima facie correct. The amount of the assessment to be paid by each member as determined by the insurer shall be considered to be likewise prima facie correct.

The insurer shall notify each member of the amount of the assessment to be paid by written notice mailed to the address of the member last of record with the insurer. Failure of the member to receive the notice so mailed, within the time specified for the payment of the assessment or at all, is no defense in an action to collect the assessment.

If a member fails to pay the assessment within the period specified in the notice, which period may not be less than 20 days after mailing, the insurer may institute suit to collect it.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.460.
Nonassessable policies, mutual insurers.

When possessing surplus funds in an amount not less than the paid-in capital stock required of a domestic stock insurer transacting like kinds of insurance, a domestic mutual insurer may, upon receipt of the director’s order so authorizing, extinguish the contingent liability of its members as to all its policies in force and may omit provisions imposing contingent liability in all its policies currently issued.

A foreign or alien mutual insurer may issue nonassessable policies to its members in this state under its article of incorporation and the laws of its domicile.

A policy of a domestic mutual insurer that, under the director’s order, is without contingent liability and thereby nonassessable by its terms may not be subject to assessment for a debt or liability of the insurer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.470.
Nonassessable policies.

The director shall revoke the authority of a domestic mutual insurer to issue policies without contingent liability if at any time the insurer’s assets are less than the sum of its liabilities and the surplus required for the authority, or if the insurer, by resolution of its board of directors approved by a majority of its members, requests that the authority be revoked.
During the absence of the authority the insurer may not issue a policy without including a provision for the contingent liability of the policyholder or renew a policy that is renewable at the option of the insurer without an endorsement providing for the contingent liability.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.480.
Participating policies.

If provided in its articles of incorporation, a domestic stock or domestic mutual insurer may issue any or all of its policies with or without participation in profits, savings, or unabsorbed portions of premiums, may classify policies issued on a participating and nonparticipating basis, and may determine the right to participate and the extent of participation of a class or classes of policies. The classification or determination shall be reasonable, and may not unfairly discriminate between policyholders within the same classifications. A life insurer may issue both participating and nonparticipating policies only if the right or absence of right to participate is reasonably related to the premium charged. A domestic insurer that, before July 1, 1966, has been issuing all or part of its policies on a participating basis without specific authorization in its articles of incorporation may continue to issue the policies on a basis not inconsistent with this section.

After the third policy year a dividend otherwise earned may not be made contingent upon the payment of renewal premium on the policy.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.490.
Dividends to stockholders.

A domestic stock insurer may not pay a cash dividend to stockholders except out of that part of its available surplus funds that is derived from realized net profits on its business.

A stock dividend may be paid out of any available surplus funds in excess of the aggregate amount of surplus loaned to the insurer under AS

21.69.520

.

A dividend otherwise proper may be payable out of the insurer’s earned surplus even though its total surplus is then less than the aggregate of its past contributed surplus resulting from issuance of its capital stock at a price in excess of the par value.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Cross references. —

For exception to the requirements of this section, see AS

21.22.100(c)

.

Sec. 21.69.500.
Dividends to mutual policyholders.

The directors of a domestic mutual insurer may from time to time apportion and pay or credit to its members dividends only out of that part of its surplus funds that represents net realized savings and net realized earnings in excess of the surplus required by law to be maintained.

A dividend otherwise proper may be payable out of the savings and earnings even though the insurer’s total surplus is then less than the aggregate of its contributed surplus.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.510.
Illegal dividends.

A director of a domestic stock or mutual insurer determined by the director, following an appropriate hearing as provided in AS

21.06.170

—

21.06.230

, to have voted for or concurred in a declaration or payment of a dividend to stockholders or members other than as authorized under AS

21.69.490

or

21.69.500

is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $2,500 and is jointly and severally liable, together with other directors likewise voting for or concurring, for any loss sustained by the insurer.

A stockholder receiving an illegal dividend shall be liable in the amount of it to the insurer.

The director may revoke or suspend the certificate of authority of an insurer that has declared or paid an illegal dividend.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 17 ch 149 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1984, an internal reference in (a) of this section was changed from AS

21.69.510

to AS

21.69.500

to correct a manifest error.

Sec. 21.69.520.
Borrowed surplus.

Subject to the director’s prior written approval, a domestic stock or mutual insurer may borrow money to defray the expenses of its organization or provide it with surplus funds upon a written agreement that the money is required to be repaid only out of the insurer’s surplus in excess of that stipulated in the agreement. The agreement may provide for interest not exceeding six percent a year, which interest may or may not constitute a liability of the insurer as to its funds other than the excess of surplus, as stipulated in the agreement. A commission or promotion expense may not be paid in connection with the loan.

Money borrowed, together with the interest, if so stipulated in the agreement, may not form a part of the insurer’s legal liabilities except as to its surplus in excess of the amount stipulated in the agreement, or be the basis of any setoff; but until repaid financial statements filed or published by the insurer shall show as a footnote the amount then unpaid together with any interest accrued but unpaid.

The loan to a mutual insurer is subject to the director’s approval. The insurer shall, in advance of the loan, file with the director a statement of the purpose of the loan and a copy of the proposed loan agreement. The loan and agreement shall be considered approved unless within 15 days after the date of the filing the insurer is notified of the director’s disapproval and the reasons for it. The director shall disapprove a proposed loan or agreement upon a finding that the loan is unnecessary or excessive for the purpose intended, or that the terms of the loan agreement are not fair and equitable to the parties, and other similar lenders, if any, to the insurer, or that the information filed by the insurer is inadequate.

This section does not apply to loans obtained by the insurer in ordinary course of business from banks and other financial institutions, or to loans secured by pledge or mortgage of assets.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 94 ch 81 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.69.530.
Impairment of capital or assets.

If an insurer becomes impaired, the director shall determine the amount of deficiency and serve notice upon the insurer to make good the deficiency within 60 days after service of the notice.

The deficiency may be made good in cash or in assets eligible under AS 21.21 for the investment of the insurer’s funds; or if a stock insurer, by reduction of the insurer’s capital to an amount not below the minimum required for the kinds of insurance thereafter to be transacted; or if a mutual insurer, by amendment of its certificate of authority to cover only the kind or kinds of insurance thereafter for which the insurer has sufficient surplus under this title.

If the deficiency is not made good and proof filed with the director within the 60-day period, the insurer shall be considered insolvent and the director shall institute delinquency proceedings against it under AS 21.78; except that if the deficiency exists because of increased loss reserves required by the director, or because of disallowance by the director of certain assets or reduction of the value at which carried in the insurer’s accounts, the director may, upon application and good cause shown, extend for not more than an additional 60 days the period within which the deficiency may be made good and the proof filed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 58 ch 50 SLA 1990)

Sec. 21.69.540.
Assessment of stockholders or members.

An insurer receiving the director’s notice mentioned in AS

21.69.530(a)

if a stock insurer, by resolution of its board of directors and subject to limitations upon assessment contained in its articles of incorporation, may assess its stockholders for amounts necessary to cure the deficiency and provide the insurer with a reasonable amount of surplus in addition; if a stockholder fails to pay a lawful assessment after notice given to the stockholder in person or by advertisement in the time and manner approved by the director, the insurer may require the return of the original certificate of stock held by the stockholder, and issue a new certificate for the number of shares the stockholder may then be entitled to, upon the basis of the stockholder’s proportionate interest in the amount of the insurer’s capital stock as determined by the director to be remaining at the time of determination of amount of impairment under AS

21.69.530

, after deducting from the proportionate interest the amount of the unpaid assessment; the insurer may pay for or reissue fractional shares under this subsection;

if a mutual insurer, shall levy an assessment upon members as provided for under AS

21.69.440

;

Neither this section nor AS

21.69.530

prohibits the insurer from curing the deficiency through any lawful means other than those referred to in those sections.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.550.
Directors’ liability for losses during deficiency.

The directors of the insurer shall be individually liable for losses incurred under policies issued by the insurer after expiration of the period provided in AS

21.69.530

for curing a deficiency of the insurer’s capital stock or surplus and before the deficiency is cured.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.560.
Stock transfer during impairment of capital.

A transfer of the stock of a domestic insurer made during the existence of an impairment of the insurer’s capital does not release the stockholder making the transfer from liability as a stockholder of the insurer that accrued before the transfer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.570.
Mutualization of stock insurers.

A stock insurer other than a title insurer may become a mutual insurer under the plan and procedure that may be approved by the director after a hearing.

The director may not approve a plan, procedure, or mutualization unless

it is equitable to stockholders and policyholders;

it is subject to approval by the holders of not less than three-fourths of the insurer’s outstanding capital stock having voting rights and by not less than two-thirds of the insurer’s policyholders who vote on the plan in person, by proxy, or by mail under the notice and procedure which may be approved by the director;

if a life insurer, the right to vote on it is limited to holders of policies other than term or group policies, and whose policies have been in force for more than one year;

mutualization will result in retirement of shares of the insurer’s capital stock at a price not in excess of the fair market value as determined by competent disinterested appraisers;

the plan provides for the purchase of the shares of a nonconsenting stockholder in the same manner and subject to the same applicable conditions as provided by the general corporation law of the state, as to rights of nonconsenting stockholders, with respect to consolidation or merger of private corporations;

the plan provides for definite conditions to be fulfilled by a designated early date upon which the mutualization will be considered effective;

the mutualization leaves the insurer with surplus funds reasonably adequate for the security of its policyholders and to enable it to continue successfully in business in the state in which it is then authorized to transact insurance, and for the kinds of insurance included in its certificates of authority in those states.

This section does not apply to mutualization ordered by a court to rehabilitate or reorganize an insurer under AS 21.78.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.580.
Converting mutual insurer.

A mutual insurer may not be converted to a stock insurer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.590.
Mergers and consolidations of stock insurers.

A domestic stock insurer may merge or consolidate with one or more domestic or foreign stock insurers authorized to transact insurance in this state, by complying with the applicable provisions of the statutes of this state governing the merger or consolidation of stock corporations formed for profit, but subject to (b) and (c) of this section.

A merger or consolidation may not be effectuated unless the plan and agreement for it have been filed with the director and approved in writing by the director after a hearing. The director shall give approval within a reasonable time after the filing unless the director finds the plan or agreement

is contrary to law;

inequitable to the stockholders of a domestic insurer involved; or

would substantially reduce the security of and service to be rendered to policyholders of the domestic insurer in this state or elsewhere.

A director, officer, agent, or employee of an insurer party to the merger or consolidation may not receive a fee, commission, compensation, or other valuable consideration for aiding, promoting, or assisting therein except as set out in the plan or agreement.

If the director does not approve the plan or agreement the director shall so notify the insurer in writing specifying the reasons.

If a domestic insurer involved in the proposed merger or consolidation is authorized to transact insurance also in other states, the director may request the insurance commissioner, director of insurance, superintendent of insurance, or other similar public insurance supervisory official of the two other states in which the insurer has in force the larger amounts of insurance, to participate in the hearing provided for under (b) of this section, with full right to examine all witnesses and evidence and to offer to the director the pertinent information and suggestions they consider proper.

A plan or proposal through which a stock insurer proposes to acquire a controlling stock interest in another stock insurer through an exchange of stock of the first insurer, issued by the insurer for the purpose, for the controlling stock of the second insurer, is considered to be a plan or proposal of merger of the second insurer into the first insurer for the purposes of this section and is subject to the applicable provisions hereof.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.600.
Mergers and consolidations, mutual insurers.

A domestic mutual insurer may not merge or consolidate with a stock insurer.

A domestic mutual insurer may merge or consolidate with another mutual insurer under the applicable procedures prescribed by the statutes of this state applying to corporations formed for profit, except as provided in this section.

The plan and agreement for merger or consolidation shall be submitted to and approved by at least two-thirds of the members of each mutual insurer involved and voting in person or by proxy at a meeting called for the purpose after reasonable notice and under procedures that have been approved by the director. If a life insurer, the right to vote may be limited to members whose policies are other than term and group policies and have been in effect for more than one year.

A merger or consolidation may not be effectuated unless the plan and agreement for it have been filed with the director and approved by the director in writing after a hearing. The director shall give the approval within a reasonable time after the filing unless the director finds the plan or agreement

is inequitable to the policyholders of a domestic insurer involved; or

would substantially reduce the security of and service to be rendered to policyholders of the domestic insurer in this state and elsewhere.

If the director does not approve the plan or agreement the director shall notify the insurers in writing specifying the reasons.

AS

21.69.590(e)

also applies to mergers and consolidations of mutual insurers.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.69.610.
Reinsurance for stock insurers.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section, a domestic stock insurer may reinsure a portion or all of its insurance in force or a major class of its insurance with another insurer by a reinsurance agreement. A reinsurance agreement shall be filed with the director within 30 days after all parties have signed the agreement. A reinsurance agreement is designated as confidential for purposes of AS

21.06.060

.

A domestic stock insurer may reinsure a portion or all of its insurance in force or a major class of its insurance with another insurer by an agreement of assumption reinsurance, but an agreement of assumption reinsurance is not effective unless filed with and approved in writing by the director after a hearing.

The director shall approve the agreement within a reasonable time after the filing unless the director finds that it is inequitable to the stockholders of the domestic insurer or would substantially reduce the protection or service to its policyholders. If the director does not approve the agreement, the director shall notify the insurer in writing specifying the reasons.

This section does not apply to a facultative reinsurance contract. In this subsection, “facultative reinsurance contract” means an agreement whereby individual risk is offered by an insurer for acceptance or rejection by a reinsurer. Under a facultative reinsurance contract, both parties are free to act in their own best interest, regardless of any prior contractual arrangement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 48 ch 96 SLA 2004)

Sec. 21.69.620.
Reinsurance for mutual insurers.

A domestic mutual insurer may reinsure a portion or all of its business in force or a portion or all of a major class of its business with another insurer, stock or mutual, by a reinsurance agreement. A reinsurance agreement shall be filed with the director within 30 days after all parties have signed the agreement. The agreement filed with the director is designated as confidential for the purposes of AS

21.06.060

. A domestic mutual insurer may reinsure a portion or all of its insurance in force or a major class of its insurance with another insurer by an agreement of assumption reinsurance. An agreement of assumption reinsurance is not effective unless filed with and approved in writing by the director after a hearing.

The director shall approve the agreement within a reasonable time after filing if the director finds it to be fair and equitable to each domestic insurer involved, and that the reinsurance, if effectuated, would not substantially reduce the protection or service to its policyholders. If the director does not approve, the director shall notify each insurer involved in writing specifying the reasons.

The plan and agreement for the reinsurance must be approved by a vote of not less than two-thirds of each domestic mutual insurer’s members voting on the plan or agreement at meetings of members called for the purpose, after reasonable notice and under procedures that the director may approve. If a life insurer, the right to vote may be limited to members whose policies are other than term or group policies, and have been in effect for more than one year.

If the agreement is for reinsurance in a stock insurer of all or substantially all of the insurance in force of a mutual insurer, the agreement must provide for payment in cash to each member of the insurer entitled thereto of the member’s equity in the business reinsured as determined under a fair formula approved by the director, as based upon the reserves, assets, whether or not “admitted” assets, and surplus, if any, of the mutual insurer to be taken over by the stock insurer.

A director, officer, agent, or employee of an insurer party to the reinsurance, or any other person, may not receive a fee, commission, or other valuable consideration for aiding, promoting, or assisting therein except as set out in the reinsurance agreement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 49 ch 96 SLA 2004)

Sec. 21.69.630.
Mutual member’s share of assets on liquidation.

Upon the liquidation of a domestic mutual insurer, its assets remaining after discharge of its indebtedness, policy obligations, repayment of contributed or borrowed surplus, if any, and expenses of administration, shall be distributed to existing persons who were its members at any time within 36 months immediately preceding the date the liquidation was authorized or ordered, or date of last termination of the insurer’s certificate of authority, whichever date is the earlier.

The distributive share of each member shall be in the proportion that the aggregate premiums earned by the insurer on the policies of the member during the combined periods of that member’s membership bear to the aggregate of all premiums earned on the policies of all the members. The insurer may, and if a life insurer shall, make a reasonable classification of its policies held by the members, and a formula based upon the classification, for determining the equitable distributive share of each member. The classification and formula is subject to the approval of the director.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)